Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2139
Public body; sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement; how made.

Any sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in section 18-2138 may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 17(2), p. 819;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1639;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2639.